Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6258.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 261h. (1) The department shall not contract with a vendor for a commercial-off-the-shelf product if the potential vendor would need to write software code to enable the product to meet the requirements and specifications of the applicable state agency work procured under the contract and 1 or both of the following conditions apply: (a) The contract would involve labor costs that exceed the base price of the commercial-off-the-shelf product, including, but not limited to, licensing and hosting fees. (b) The potential vendor is not able to provide more than 1 example of successful implementation of the commercial-off-the-shelf product. (2) As used in this section, "commercial-off-the-shelf product" means a software product that is commercially ready-made and available for sale, lease, or license to the general public.